Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. General Licensing Provisions
§ 33-28-106.
Application for license; qualifications; sworn statement; commission approval of course of study; statement of responsible broker; denial of license; issuing licenses.

Any person desiring to act as a licensee shall file an application for a license with the commission. The application shall be in the form and detail as the commission shall prescribe and the individual applicant shall provide to the commission fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a).

Licenses shall be granted only to persons who bear a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness, integrity and competence to transact the business of a licensee in a manner which will safeguard the interests of the public, and only after satisfactory proof of the individual applicant’s qualifications has been presented to the commission.

Each applicant for a responsible broker’s license shall:

Have reached the age of majority;

Have first served actively for two (2) of the four (4) years immediately preceding the application as a real estate salesperson or associate broker; and

Submit other evidence through the application or otherwise, as the commission deems desirable with due regard to the paramount interests of the public, as to the honesty, truthfulness, integrity and competency of the individual applicant.

Every member of a real estate company acting as a responsible broker for that real estate company who engages in any real estate activity shall obtain a responsible broker’s license.

Every applicant for a responsible broker’s or associate broker’s license shall state:

The name of the real estate company with which he will be associated in the business of real estate;

The location of the place or places for which the license is desired;

The period of time, if any, which he has been engaged in the real estate business;

His present address, both of business and residence;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 96, § 2.

That he has or has not been refused a real estate license in this or any other state;

That his real estate license has or has not been revoked in this or any other state;

Evidence that he has completed not less than sixty (60) cumulative class hours in a course of study approved by the commission, given by instructors approved by the commission and has satisfactorily passed an examination covering material taught in each course.

through (D) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

Each applicant for a salesperson’s license shall:

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

Have reached the age of majority;

Submit other evidence as the commission deems desirable with due regard to the paramount interests of the public as to the honesty, truthfulness, integrity and competency of the individual applicant;

Furnish the name of the real estate company with which he will be associated in the business of real estate;

Furnish the period of time, if any, that he has been engaged in the real estate business;

Furnish his present address;

Furnish the name and address of his previous employer;

Furnish a statement that he has or has not been refused a real estate license in this or any other state;

Furnish a statement that his real estate license has or has not been revoked in this or any other state;

Furnish evidence that he has completed not less than thirty (30) class hours in a course of study approved by the commission, given by instructors approved by the commission and has satisfactorily passed an examination covering material taught in each course;

Include a statement by the responsible broker in whose service the applicant is about to enter stating:

The name and address of the responsible broker’s real estate company;

That in his opinion the applicant is honest, truthful and recommends the license be granted to the applicant;

That the responsible broker will actively supervise and train the applicant during the period the requested license remains in effect.

The commission may consider prior revocation, conduct or conviction in its determination of whether to grant an applicant a license if the applicant:

Has been fined or disciplined or had his real estate license revoked, suspended, censured or placed on probation in any jurisdiction;

Is found to have committed any of the practices enumerated in W.S.

33-28-111

during the term of his prior licensure; or

Has been convicted of any felony that relates to the practice of real estate activity or to the ability to practice the duties of a responsible real estate licensee or any felony sexual offense or violent crime.

The commission shall take into account the nature of the offense, any aggravating or extenuating circumstances, the time elapsed since the revocation, conduct or conviction, the rehabilitation or restitution performed by the applicant and other factors as the commission deems relevant.

The commission may deny a license to any person who has been determined by the commission after hearing to have engaged in a licensed real estate activity without a license.

The commission shall issue licenses in a form and size as the commission shall prescribe.

A false statement of material fact made in an application shall in itself be sufficient grounds for the refusal of a license.

Each individual applicant for an associate broker’s license shall:

Have reached the age of majority;

Have first served actively for two (2) of the four (4) years immediately preceding the application as a salesperson or shall furnish to the commission proof indicating that the applicant holds a degree in real estate from an accredited university or college; and

Submit other evidence through the application or otherwise, as the commission deems desirable with due regard to the paramount interests of the public as to the honesty, truthfulness, integrity and competency of the individual applicant.

The commission shall:

Approve courses that cover real estate principles, real estate law, real estate finance and related topics;

Promulgate rules and regulations to provide a process for challenging a course in lieu of evidence of completion of class hours;

Publish a list of approved real estate courses and keep the list updated annually;

On request, evaluate a specific course or courses which are not on the approved list and approve or disapprove the course.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.6; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2005, ch. 96, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (e)(v), which required an applicant for a broker's license to furnish in his sworn statement a complete list of all former places where he may have resided or been engaged in business for a period of 60 days or more during the last five years.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “real” in (e)(viii)(A).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and the applicant shall provide to the commission fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a)” following “prescribe” in (a); and added “including a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a)” following “commission” in (b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a) and (b), substituted “licensee” for “real estate broker, associate broker or real estate salesman” or similar language, and added “individual”; in (b), deleted “including a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a)” after “to the commission”; in (c), made changes to credentials required for applicants for broker's license, and made stylistic changes; in (d), made stylistic changes; in (e), made stylistic changes, and repealed former (e)(viii)(A) through (e)(viii)(D), which listed the commission's duties regarding the course of study for prospective brokers; rewrote (f), to restate the information to be included in the applicant's written statement by deleting former (f)(i) through (f)(vii) and adding (f)(viii) through (f)(xvii); in (g), made a stylistic change in the introductory language; rewrote (g)(i), which formerly read: “Has had his real estate license revoked on a prior occasion”; in (k), substituted “licenses” for “to each broker and to each salesman licensee a license and pocket card”; and added (n) and (o).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted gender-neutral terms throughout.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (g)(iii), added “that relates to the practice of real estate activity or to the ability to practice the duties of a responsible real estate licensee or any felony sexual offense or violent crime” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

§ 33-28-107.
Examinations; responsible broker, associate broker and salesperson’s licenses.

In addition to proof of honesty, trustworthiness and good reputation, each applicant desiring to become licensed as a real estate responsible broker, associate broker or a real estate salesperson shall execute and file an application for examination upon a form prescribed by the commission and shall pass a written examination prepared by or under the supervision of the commission. The examination shall be given at times and at places within the state as the commission shall prescribe. The examination for a salesperson’s license shall include business ethics, composition, arithmetic, elementary principles of land economics and appraisal, a general knowledge of the statutes of this state relating to deeds, mortgages, contracts of sale, agency and the provisions of this act. The examinations for responsible broker and associate broker’s licenses shall be of a more exacting nature and scope and more stringent than the examination for a salesperson’s license.

No applicant shall engage in real estate activity until he has satisfactorily passed the examination, complied with the other requirements of this act and until a license has been issued to him.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.7; Laws 1977, ch. 146, § 1; 1983, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “real estate activity” for “the real estate business either as a broker or salesman.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “responsible broker, associate broker” for “broker” or variants throughout the text, substituted “The examinations” for “The examination” at the beginning of the last sentence, and substituted gender-neutral terms.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

§ 33-28-108.
Fees.

Pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, the commission shall establish fees for examinations, original licenses, modified licenses, renewals, certifications, change of place of business and transfers. The fees shall be used to pay the expense of maintaining and operating the office of the commission and the enforcement of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.8; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “and duplicate licenses” for “duplicate licenses and duplicate pocket cards.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “Pursuant to
W.S.

33-1-201

, the commission shall establish fees for examinations, original licenses, renewals, certifications, change of place of business, transfers and duplicate licenses.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

§ 33-28-109.
Responsible broker to establish a real estate company, maintain fixed principal office; change of address; branch offices; restrictions on associate brokers and salespersons.

Each resident responsible broker shall lawfully establish at least one (1) but no more than three (3) real estate companies or sole proprietorships within Wyoming and acquire a license for each real estate company. Each resident responsible broker shall maintain a fixed principal office for each company or sole proprietorship within this state. A resident responsible broker operating as a sole proprietorship shall not be required to acquire an additional company license. The address of each office shall be designated on all licenses associated with the office and no license issued under this act shall authorize the licensee to transact real estate activity at any other address except a licensed branch office. In case of removal from a designated address, the responsible broker shall apply to the commission before the removal designating the new location of an office and paying the required fee, whereupon the commission shall issue a license for the new location for the unexpired period if the new location complies with the terms of this act.

A responsible broker may conduct business from a branch office. A branch office shall use the same trade name or business name as the licensed real estate company. A company license shall be issued to the responsible broker for each branch office the responsible broker maintains. Every branch office shall be under the direction and supervision of the responsible broker. A responsible broker requesting a branch office license shall also, in addition to the branch office application, submit a plan of supervision for the branch office for approval by the commission.

An associate broker or salesperson shall not be associated or engaged under contract to any other responsible broker than is designated upon the license issued to the associate broker or salesperson. Upon termination of an associate broker’s or salesperson’s association or contractual relationship, his responsible broker shall immediately notify the commission for cancellation of the associate broker’s or salesperson’s license. Whenever a licensed associate broker or salesperson desires to change his contractual relationship from one (1) responsible broker to another, he shall notify the commission promptly in writing of the facts attendant thereon and pay the required fee. Upon application, the commission shall issue a new license under the new responsible broker. No associate broker or salesperson shall directly or indirectly associate himself with a responsible broker until he has been issued a license to do so with that responsible broker.

No more than one (1) license to conduct real estate activity shall be issued to any responsible broker, associate broker or salesperson to be in effect at one (1) time except as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.9; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2007, ch. 171, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 33, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) deleted “who resides in the community in which the branch office is located” from the second sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a) and (b) , deleting need to display licenses in office, and making stylistic changes; and rewrote (c), providing for steps that an associate broker or salesman must take upon termination of their association or contractual relationship, and making stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) added “shall lawfully…sole proprietorship” to the
first sentence, added “each resident responsible broker,” “principle,” and “for each company or sole proprietorship” to the second sentence, and substituted “each” for “the” in the third sentence; in (b) deleted “If a responsible broker maintains more than one (1) place of business within the state, a branch office” from the first sentence, added “A responsible broker may conduct business from a branch office” to the first sentence, added the second sentence, added “A company” to the beginning of the third sentence, and substituted “the responsible broker maintains” for “so maintained by him” in the third sentence; in (d) added “to conduct real estate activity” toward the beginning, substituted “responsible broker, associate broker or salesperson” for “salesman,” and added “except as provided in subsection(a) of this section” to the end; made stylistic changes; substituted gender-neutral terms, and made related changes.

The 2022 amendment,

in (a), deleted “or sole proprietorship” at the end of the first sentence, and added the third sentence.

Laws 2022, ch. 33, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 33, § 2, provides, “This act applies to licenses issued on and after July 1, 2022.”

§ 33-28-110.
Unlawful to compensate unlicensed person; licensing of like-licensed nonresidents; service of process on nonresidents.

It is unlawful for any responsible broker to compensate any person who is not a licensee associated with his real estate company or a responsible broker for another real estate company for performing any real estate activity provided, however, that a responsible broker may pay compensation to a licensed broker of another state if the nonresident broker does not conduct any real estate activity in this state for which compensation is paid.

A nonresident may be issued a Wyoming responsible broker’s license if:

The individual holds a like-license in his home state;

The individual is actively engaged in the real estate business and maintains a place of business in his home state;

The individual meets all the other requirements of this act and rules and regulations of the commission; and

The individual furnishes the commission a statement under seal of the commission of his home state evidencing that he is an active licensed responsible broker, or an equivalent, in good standing and has no complaints pending against him in his home state.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

A nonresident may be issued a Wyoming associate broker or salesperson license if:

The individual holds a like-license in his home state;

The individual is actively engaged in the real estate business in his home state;

The individual meets all the other requirements of this act and rules and regulations of the commission; and

The individual furnishes the commission a statement under seal of the commission of his home state evidencing that he holds an active license in good standing and has no complaints pending against him in his home state.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 171, § 2.

Prior to being issued a license, every nonresident licensee shall file with the commission a designation in writing which appoints the director of the commission to act as his licensed agent upon whom all judicial and other process or legal notices directed to the licensee may be served. Service upon the agent so designated shall be equivalent to personal service upon the licensee. Copies of the appointment, certified by the director of the commission, shall be received in evidence in any proceeding and shall be given the same force and effect as the original. In the written designation the licensee shall agree that any lawful process against the licensee which is served upon his appointed agent shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon the licensee, and that the authority of the agent shall continue in force so long as any liability of the licensee remains outstanding in this state. Upon the receipt of any process or notice, the director shall mail a copy of the same by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known business address of the licensee.

through (j) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.10; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2007, ch. 171, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (e), which read: “If a nonresident licensee becomes a resident of this state or if he desires to maintain a place of business in this state, or be employed by or associated with a broker maintaining a place of business in this state he shall secure a regular resident license in compliance with this act and rules governing original resident applicants. If an applicant's home state requires a resident of this state to maintain a place of business in that state in order to transact business in that state, the applicant shall maintain a place of business in this state and need not secure a regular resident license to maintain a place of business in this state in order to transact business in this state. A nonresident of this state shall meet the same rules and requirements of his resident state in order to obtain a reciprocal license in this state.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), made stylistic changes; substituted “Wyoming responsible” for “nonresident Wyoming” in the introductory language of (b); in (b)(i), substituted “holds a like-license” for “is a licensed broker”; in (b)(iii), added “and rules and regulations of the commission”; substituted (b)(iv) for former (b)(iv) which read: “The individual's home state has entered into a reciprocal agreement with the commission relating to the issuance of reciprocal licenses”; repealed former (c), which provided conditions under which a nonresident broker's license may be issued without examination to a real estate broker licensed under the laws of another state”; rewrote (d) providing the conditions under which a nonresident may be issued a Wyoming license; in (f), substituted “licensee” for “broker”; and repealed former (g) through (j), which provided for written agreement by the nonresident broker to abide by provisions of act and submit to jurisdiction of commission, providing for nonresident broker to file proof of authorization to conduct business in any other state and pay license fee, and conditions for nonresident licenses to remain in force.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(iv) at the beginning substituted “individual” for “broker” and substituted “licensed responsible broker, or an equivalent” for “licensed broker;” and in (d) substituted gender-neutral terms.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Effect of agreement to share on suit for commission. —

In an action by a licensed broker for his commission for sale of real estate, fact that broker had agreed to share his commission with an unlicensed person was held of no consequence. Foley v. Hassey, 55 Wyo. 24, 95 P.2d 85,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Out-of-state broker may cooperate with in-state broker. —

The purpose of this chapter, protecting the public, is not violated when a broker, licensed in another state, cooperates with a broker licensed in this state, where a sale occurs, in procuring a purchaser, but does not actually conduct negotiations in Wyoming. Bowlerama, Inc. v. Woodside Realty Co., 752 P.2d 1377,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. Apr. 28, 1988).

§ 33-28-111.
Censure of licensee and suspension or revocation of license; grounds.

The commission shall upon a written sworn complaint or may upon its own motion investigate the actions of any licensee conducting real estate advertising, self promotion as a licensee or real estate activity regarding real estate located in Wyoming, impose an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each separate offense and may censure a licensee, place a licensee on probation and set the terms of probation, suspend or revoke any license issued under this act for any of the following:

Making any substantial misrepresentation, false promises or false or fraudulent representation;

Violation of this act or any rule of the commission;

Failing to disclose an interest in the transaction;

Soliciting the breach of a listing or a property management contract;

Conducting real estate activity directly with a buyer or seller if the licensee knows the buyer or seller has an outstanding written agreement in connection with the real estate with another responsible broker;

Using advertising which:

Is misleading or is inaccurate in any matter material to the transaction; or

Uses a trade name, collective membership mark, service mark or logo name, mark or logo without authorization owned by another person unless authorized to do so.

Placing a sign on any property offering it for sale or rent without the written consent of the owner or his authorized agent;

Offering real estate for sale or lease without the knowledge and consent of the owner or his authorized agent or on terms other than those authorized by the owner or his authorized agent;

If a responsible broker, failing to supervise the activities of his associate broker or salesperson;

Failing to advise the buyer and seller of all terms of the proposed sale at the time an offer is presented including estimated discounts and closing costs;

Unreasonably failing upon demand to surrender to the rightful owner, any document or instrument in his possession;

Unreasonably failing to produce documents of record in his possession or under his control concerning any real estate transaction under investigation by the commission;

Failing to submit all offers to a seller or buyer;

Commingling the money or other property of others with his own;

Accepting, giving or charging an undisclosed compensation, rebate or direct or indirect profit on expenditures made for others;

Engaging in real estate activity as an associate broker or salesperson involving the representing or attempt to represent a responsible broker other than his responsible broker or a real estate company other than the real estate company under which he is licensed;

Accepting compensation by an associate broker or salesperson from anyone other than his responsible broker;

Acting for more than one (1) party in a transaction without the written acknowledgement of all parties for whom the licensee acts;

Guaranteeing or authorizing any person to guarantee future profits which may result from the resale of real estate;

Failing to obtain written listing agreements identifying the property to be sold or acquired and containing all terms and conditions under which the property is to be sold or acquired including the price or price range, the compensation to be paid, the signatures of all parties concerned and a definite expiration date;

Failing to deliver within a reasonable time a completed copy of any document to all parties;

Conviction of a felony that relates to the practice of real estate activity or to the ability to perform the duties of a licensee or any felony sexual offense or violent crime;

Compensating any unlicensed person for performing real estate activity;

Failing to specify he is being compensated by more than one (1) party and failing to notify all parties involved;

Failing to account for any monies or property received from others;

Failing to keep the funds of others in an escrow or trust account, unless each person with an interest in the funds has agreed otherwise in writing;

Failing to deposit all financial instruments in an escrow or trust account within one (1) banking day in a financial institution in this state, unless each person with an interest in the funds has agreed otherwise in writing;

Failing upon consummation or termination of the transaction to give a full accounting of the monies and property placed in escrow or trust showing dates of deposit, management and withdrawals;

If a responsible broker:

Failing to deliver to the parties in every real estate transaction at the time the transaction is closed a complete, detailed closing statement showing all of the receipts and disbursements handled by the licensees in his office for the parties unless a clear and accurate accounting is furnished by another real estate licensee or a funds holder;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

Failing to retain true copies of statements required by this paragraph in his files;

Failing to disclose, in every real estate transaction, the names of all real estate companies for which a responsible broker holds a license.

Representing to any lender, guaranteeing agency or any other interested party, either verbally or through the preparation of false documents, an amount in excess of the true and actual sale price of the real estate or terms differing from those actually agreed upon;

Accepting other than cash as earnest money unless:

The fact is communicated to the owner prior to the owner’s acceptance of the offer to purchase; and

The fact is shown in the earnest money receipt.

Refusing to appear or testify under oath at any hearing held by the commission;

Receiving more than three (3) censures from the commission within a two (2) year period.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the commission, the commission shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

All administrative fines collected under this section shall be paid to the state treasurer to be credited to the public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.11; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 96, § 1; 2009, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; 2014 ch. 118, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added provisions for administrative fines and probation in (a); and added (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “this act or” preceding “any rule” in (a)(ii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in addition to making stylistic and related changes, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “and impose an administrative fine” after “under this act”; in (a)(xiii), substituted “to a seller or buyer” for “in writing to a seller, if received prior to the written acceptance of any offer”; in (a)(xxvi) and (a)(xxvii), added “unless each person with an interest in the funds has agreed otherwise in writing”; and repealed former (a)(xxix)(B), which read: “Failing to deliver to the buyer a complete statement showing all money received in every real estate transaction from the buyer and how and for what the same was disbursed unless a clear and accurate accounting is furnished by an escrow agent.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “buyer or seller” for “owner or lessor”; in (a)(xx), substituted “Failing to obtain written listing agreements identifying the property to be sold or acquired and containing all terms and conditions under which the property is to be sold or acquired including the price or price range, the compensation to be paid, the signatures of all parties concerned and a definite expiration date” for “Failing to obtain written listing agreements identifying the property and containing all terms and conditions under which the property is to be sold including the price, the compensation to be paid, the signatures of all parties concerned and a definite expiration date.”

Laws 2014, ch. 118, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) added “real estate advertising, self promotion as a licensee or” following “any licensee conducting,” in (a)(xvi) added “or a real estate company other than the real estate company under which he is licensed” to the end, in (a)(xxix)(A) substituted “real estate licensee” for “broker,” added (a)(iixi)(D); and substituted gender-neutral terms.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(xxii), added “that relates to the practice of real estate activity or to the ability to perform the duties of a licensee or any felony sexual offense or violent crime ” at the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Agent's duty to client. —

The law requires a real estate agent not only to refrain from taking advantage of a client, but also to act with the utmost good faith and disclose any material facts ascertainable by the agent which may affect the client's decision to purchase or sell, as the case may be. Hagar v. Mobley, 638 P.2d 127,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 404

(Wyo. 1981).

Disclosure of terms. —

A broker's statutory duty to advise his client of the terms of the proposed contract is fulfilled when an explanation commensurate with the education and understanding of the client has been made. Snyder v. Lovercheck, 992 P.2d 1079,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1999).

Failure to disclose did not constitute fraudulent misrepresentation. —

In an action arising from the cancellation of a purchase contract for a ranch after the purchaser discovered the extent to which two coal surface mining agreements encumbered the ranch, under the general fraud standard contained in paragraph (a)(i), the failure of the real estate brokers involved in the transaction to disclose the existence and the effect of the agreements in a brochure and map was not fraudulent misrepresentation. Sundown, Inc. v. Pearson Real Estate Co., 8 P.3d 324,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2000).

Liability sounds in tort. —

The liability of real estate agents, brokers and salespersons, as in all actions predicated upon the failure to perform some duty, sounds in tort. Hagar v. Mobley, 638 P.2d 127,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 404

(Wyo. 1981).

Licensee not rendered “incompetent” by furnishing incorrect property description. —

Although furnishing an incorrect property description may be negligent, it does not render a licensee “incompetent” within the meaning of former subsection (a)(ix). McCoy v. Thompson, 677 P.2d 839,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1983 amendment).

Lease agreements. —

Paragraph (a)(xx) is a licensing regulatory statute that, by its terms, applies only to listing agreements for the sale of property; it does not apply to lease agreements. Gray v. Stratton Real Estate, 2001 WY 125, 36 P.3d 1127,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2001).

Written listing agreement prior to advertising. —

Subsection (a)(xx) does not contain any language which states that the written listing agreement must be obtained before a broker may advertise the property, although the “is to be sold” language indicates that a written listing agreement should be obtained before the property is actually sold. Bowen v. State, 900 P.2d 1140,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1995).

Effect of agreement to share on suit for commission. —

In an action by a licensed broker for his commission for sale of real estate, fact that broker had agreed to share his commission with an unlicensed person was held of no consequence. Foley v. Hassey, 55 Wyo. 24, 95 P.2d 85,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

No violation of subsection (a)(xviii). —

See Erickson v. Magill, 713 P.2d 1182,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 476

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Mader v. James, 546 P.2d 190,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1976); Wyoming Realty Co. v. Cook, 872 P.2d 551,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Toavs v. State, 635 P.2d 1172,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Wheeler v. Woods, 723 P.2d 1224,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 598

(Wyo. 1986); Willmschen v. Meeker, 750 P.2d 669,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1988); Earlywine v. Peterson ex rel. Wyo. Real Estate Comm'n, 885 P.2d 861,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1994); Throckmartin v. Century 21 Top Realty, 2010 WY 23, 226 P.3d 793,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Mar. 3, 2010).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Grounds for revocation or suspension of license of real estate broker or salesman, 56 ALR2d 573.

Suspension or revocation of real estate broker's license on ground of discrimination, 42 ALR3d 1099.

Revocation or suspension of real estate broker's license for violation of statutes or regulations prohibiting use of unlicensed personnel in carrying out duties, 68 ALR3d 530.

Revocation or suspension of real-estate broker's license for conduct not connected with business as broker, 22 ALR4th 136.

Real-estate broker's or agent's misrepresentation to, or failure to inform, vendor regarding value of vendor's real property, 33 ALR4th 944.

Real-estate broker's liability to purchaser for misrepresentation or nondisclosure of physical defects in property sold, 46 ALR4th 546.

Grounds for revocation or suspension of license of real-estate broker or salesperson, 7 ALR5th 474.